Hawaii statutes.
§189-26 Reports. The department shall
make an annual report for the period ending December 31 to the governor, the
president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives, on
the progress made under this part. The report shall be submitted not later
than February 1 immediately following the calendar-year period covered by the
report. [L 1965, c 193, §7; Supp, §21-106; HRS §189-26; am L 1975, c 167, pt of
§4; am L 1976, c 70, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next